Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3544
Hospital district; dissolution; petition; signatures required; submission to electors.

Upon the filing of a petition with the board of directors signed by ten percent of the qualified electors in the district, the board of directors shall submit the question of dissolution of the district to the district electors at the next annual district election. If a majority of the voters favor dissolution, the board shall by resolution dissolve the district.

Laws 1959, c. 83, § 16, p. 379;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.35.